Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 5. Department of Buildings and General Services
§ 165.
Space allocation, inventory, and use; leasing property; Commissioner’s preapproval required.

For purposes of this section, “agency” shall mean every Executive agency and the Judicial Department, every department not within an agency, every board, commission, or other entity not attached to an agency or department for administrative purposes, every not-for-profit corporation or entity occupying or using State-owned space, and shall include the Offices of the Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court, the Court Administrator’s Office, the Auditor of Accounts, the Attorney General, the Secretary of State, and the State Treasurer. “Agency” shall not mean, nor shall this section apply to, an entity not affiliated with the Executive or Judicial Branch of State government and not located in State-owned property, even though the entity may receive State capital funds. This section shall not apply to the Vermont State Colleges.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall implement all reasonable and necessary measures to utilize all available space in all State buildings or structures before any improved property not owned by the State is leased to accommodate space needs of an agency.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall have sole jurisdiction, sole authority, and sole responsibility for making space allocations and designating uses in any portions of any building or structure for which the Department of Buildings and General Services leases or pays for operation and maintenance expenses, or for which construction or fit-up was financed through an appropriation to the Department of Buildings and General Services.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall by rule establish procedures which all agencies shall follow in the leasing of real property. No agency shall enter into any lease, no lease shall be valid, and no State funds shall be paid by the Department of Finance and Management pursuant to the terms of any lease, unless the proposed lease has been preapproved by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services. If a lease is entered into pursuant to this section, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall preapprove any additional fees, reimbursements, charges, or fit-up costs in excess of the proposed lease rental rate.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall maintain an inventory of all State-owned buildings and shall biannually compile and update the information received under subsection (g) of this section, which shall be considered once available in making spacing allocations and designating uses under subsection (c) of this section.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall maintain an inventory and provide any known information on all existing rights-of-way, including all conduits, ducts, passages, or attachments available, granted to, or presently used by telecommunications carriers. The inventory shall describe the ownership of such rights-of-way and the used and existing capacity thereof.

The head of each agency shall prepare and forward to the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services when requested by the Commissioner in a format prescribed by the Commissioner an inventory of: square footage available for use; square footage in actual use; square footage not in use; square footage used for storage; square footage that is unfinished; cost per square foot for rent; cost per square foot for operation and maintenance; and the source of funds for rent, operation, and maintenance, including the act and section numbers of a legislative directive if applicable.

No State-owned space in any State-owned building, structure, or other real property under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may be leased, occupied, or licensed for any purpose for less than its fair market value as determined by the prevailing area market prices for comparable space or property, except as follows:

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may lease or license State-owned property under his or her jurisdiction for less than prevailing area market prices to municipalities, nonprofit organizations, school districts, or to persons whose proposed activities are determined by the Commissioner to serve a public purpose and when the term of the lease or license is less than three years.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may lease or license State-owned property under his or her jurisdiction for less than prevailing area market prices with the approval of the Joint Fiscal Committee when the term of the lease or license is three years or longer, or when the lease or license requested is a renewal of a lease or license issued pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and any other provision of law pertaining to State facilities, this section shall control.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. May 22, 1996; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b);

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

1999, No. 29

, § 40, eff. May 19, 1999;

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. June 27, 2002;

2013, No. 51

, § 26, eff. May 29, 2013.

§ 166.
Selling or renting State property.

As agent of the State, with the advice and consent of the Governor unless otherwise provided, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may lease for a term not exceeding 10 years any real property owned by the State and not used for State purposes. This subsection shall not apply to leases of land pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 83.

Upon authorization by the General Assembly, which may be granted by resolution, and with the advice and consent of the Governor, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may sell real estate owned by the State. Such property shall be sold to the highest bidder therefor at public auction or upon sealed bids in the discretion of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, who may reject any or all bids. Notice of the sale or a request for sealed bids shall be posted in at least three public places in the town where the property is located and also published three times in a newspaper having a known circulation in the town, the last publication to be not less than 10 days before the date of sale or opening of the bids. Failing to consummate a sale under the method prescribed in this section, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is authorized to list the sale of this property with a real estate agent licensed by the State of Vermont. This subsection shall not apply to the sale, conveyance, exchange, or lease of lands or interests in lands; to the amendment of deeds, leases, and easements; or to sales of timber made in accordance with the provisions of 10 V.S.A. chapter 155 or the provisions of 10 V.S.A. chapter 83.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not be construed to allow the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services to grant oil and gas leases on State-owned lands located within Vermont, but, with the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may sell or lease State lands for which an oil and gas lease has been granted, subject, however, to the terms and conditions of such oil and gas lease; provided, however, the Commissioner shall be responsible for any interests owned by the State in oil and gas resources located outside the State and may, after consultation with the Secretaries of Administration and of Natural Resources, lease or sell any such interest.

The net proceeds from the sale of any real property owned by the State shall be paid into a capital fund account to be used for future capital construction projects as authorized by the General Assembly, except that such proceeds may be used as otherwise directed by the General Assembly, which legislative direction may be by resolution.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, specific approval is hereby granted by the General Assembly for the execution of new leases by an authorized State agent with the present lessees of individual camp lots on State lands on Groton, Marshfield, and Ricker ponds for a period exceeding 10 years.

It is the legislative intent that any future costs to the State agent resulting from conditions in the leases specified in subsection (e) of this section that would permit or require the purchase of property from lessees by the State agent shall be funded directly by the General Assembly or, if it is not in session, by the Emergency Board.

Any person who on April 8, 1975, is a lessee of State lands on Groton, Marshfield, and Ricker ponds may by letter petition the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation in order to obtain a lease that runs to both the lessee and the lessee’s spouse upon application and accompanying payment of $10.00. The Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation shall, within 30 days, prepare, execute and deliver to the lessee a new lease that runs to both lessee and lessee’s spouse. All terms of the new lease shall be identical to the terms of the old lease. Upon execution of the new lease by lessee and lessee’s spouse, the old lease shall be void.
(g) (1) Any person who on April 8, 1975, is a lessee of State lands on Groton, Marshfield, and Ricker ponds may by letter petition the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation in order to obtain a lease that runs to both the lessee and the lessee’s spouse upon application and accompanying payment of $10.00. The Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation shall, within 30 days, prepare, execute and deliver to the lessee a new lease that runs to both lessee and lessee’s spouse. All terms of the new lease shall be identical to the terms of the old lease. Upon execution of the new lease by lessee and lessee’s spouse, the old lease shall be void.

The petition brought by the lessee shall state that the lessee desires to have the lease run to both lessee and lessee’s spouse. The petition shall include the full name of the lessee’s spouse, the spouse’s Social Security number, if any, and the full address of the spouse.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 16(a);

1965, No. 155

, § 2;

1973, No. 7

;

1973, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 29, 1974;

1975, No. 29

, § 1, eff. April 8, 1975;

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 28, 1982;

1985, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 13, 1988;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 71, eff. April 29, 1998;

2003, No. 63

, § 27;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. June 8, 2004;

2017, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 28, 2018;

2019, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. July 6, 2020.

§ 167.
Rental of State property to veterans’ organizations.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is hereby authorized to lease to national veterans’ organizations, with established central offices in this State, the first floor of the Adams House on State Street in the City of Montpelier, or some comparable space in some other building in said City of Montpelier owned by State, federal, county, or municipal government or by a private party, except the State Capitol, State Library, Pavilion State office building and the State office building at 120 State Street. Said lease shall be on a year-to-year basis with the right of renewal thereof by the lessee but with right of the lessor to terminate said lease upon notice of not less than six months to the said lessees. The rent shall be for the nominal sum of $1.00 per year for each tenant organization. Space allocations to the various organizations shall be made and may be modified from time to time by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services. Interior repairs and alterations shall be at the expense of the respective tenant subject to the approval of and under the supervision of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services and exterior repairs shall be at the expense of the State and under the supervision of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services. The expense of light, heat, and water as proportionately allocated by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall be paid by the tenant organization into the Property Management Fund established by section 160 of this title, expect that any costs above the proportional costs shall be paid out of the operating funds of the Vermont Adjutant General.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 16(b);

1987, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. June 13, 1988;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

1999, No. 1

, § 100, eff. March 31, 1999;

1999, No. 1

48

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. May 24, 2000;

2003, No. 63

, § 28.

§ 168.
State Energy Management Program; Revolving Funds.

State Energy Management Program.

There is established within the Department of Buildings and General Services the Energy Management Program for administering the interest of the State in all energy management measures in State buildings and facilities, including equipment replacement, studies, weatherization, construction of improvements affecting the use of energy resources, the implementation of energy efficiency and conservation measures, and the use of renewable resources.

The Energy Management Program shall be implemented through two revolving funds used to finance energy management measures in State buildings and facilities. Pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the State Resource Management Revolving Fund shall provide revenue for implementation of resource conservation measures, and the Energy Revolving Fund shall provide funding for energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources. The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall establish guidelines for the provision of funding for energy management measures through these revolving funds.

All energy management measures taken pursuant to this section shall be made and executed by and in the name of the Commissioner.

State Resource Management Revolving Fund.

There is established the Resource Management Revolving Fund to provide revenue for implementation of resource conservation measures anticipated to generate a life cycle cost benefit to the State. All State agencies responsible for development and operations and maintenance of State infrastructure shall have access to the Resource Management Revolving Fund on a priority basis established by the Commissioner.

The Fund shall consist of:

monies appropriated to the Fund, or which are paid to it under authorization of the Emergency Board;

monies saved by the implementation of resource management conservation measures; and

fees for administrative costs paid by departments and agencies, which shall be fixed by the Commissioner subject to the approval of the Secretary of Administration.

[Repealed.]

Monies from the Fund shall be expended by the Commissioner for resource conservation measures anticipated to generate a life cycle cost benefit to the State and all necessary costs involved with the administration of State agency energy planning as determined by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall establish criteria to determine eligibility for funding of resource conservation measures.

Agencies or departments receiving funding shall repay the Fund through their regular operating budgets according to a schedule established by the Commissioner. Repayment shall include charges of fees for administrative costs over the term of the repayment.

The Commissioner of Finance and Management may anticipate receipts to this Fund and issue warrants based thereon.

The Commissioner shall maintain accurate and complete records of all receipts by and expenditures from the Fund.

All balances remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried over to the following year.

Energy Revolving Fund.

There is established an Energy Revolving Fund to finance energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources in State buildings and facilities anticipated to generate a cost-savings to the State. State agencies and departments shall have access to the Energy Revolving Fund on a priority basis established by the Commissioner and the State Treasurer.

The Fund shall consist of:

monies appropriated to the Fund or which are paid to it under authorization of the Emergency Board;

monies saved by the implementation of energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources;

any funds available through a credit facility maintained by the State Treasurer in accordance with subsection (d) of this section; and

fees for administrative costs paid by departments and agencies, which shall be fixed by the Commissioner subject to the approval of the Secretary of Administration.

Monies from the Fund shall be expended by the Commissioner for measures anticipated to generate a cost-savings to the State and costs involved with the administration of the State agency energy plan as determined by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner and the State Treasurer shall establish criteria to determine eligibility for funding of energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources, including returns of investment on terms acceptable to the State Treasurer.

Agencies and departments receiving funding shall repay the Fund through their regular operating budget according to a schedule established by the Commissioner. Repayment shall include charges of fees for administrative costs over the term of the repayment.

The Commissioner of Finance and Management may anticipate receipts to this Fund and issue warrants based thereon.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall maintain accurate and complete records of all receipts by and expenditures from the Fund.

All balances remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried over to the following year; provided, however, that any amounts received in repayment of the credit facility established under subsection (d) of this section may be reinvested by the State Treasurer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the State Treasurer, working in collaboration with the Department of Buildings and General Services, shall have the authority to establish a credit facility of up to $8,000,000.00, on terms acceptable to the State Treasurer. The credit facility shall be used for the purpose of financing energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources anticipated to generate a cost-savings to the State.

As used in this section:

“Energy efficiency improvement” means a set of measures aimed at reducing the energy used by specific end-use devices and systems to provide light, heat, cooling, or other services without affecting the level of service provided. An energy efficiency project may also include energy conservation measures; that is, a reduction in energy consumption that corresponds with a reduction in service demand.

“Renewables” has the same meaning as under

30 V.S.A. § 8002

.

“Resource conservation measures” means a set of measures, including a study, product, process, or technology, aimed at reducing overall use or consumption of energy resources in State buildings or facilities. “Resource conservation measures” includes energy efficiency improvements.

Beginning on or before January 15, 2015 and annually thereafter, the Department of Buildings and General Services shall report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions on the expenditure of funds from the State Resource Management Revolving Fund for resource conservation measures and the Energy Revolving Fund for energy efficiency improvements and the use of renewable resources. For each fiscal year, the report shall include a summary of each project receiving funding and the State’s expected savings. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. June 8, 2004; amended

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2009, No. 33

, § 56;

2011, No. 40

, § 48, eff. May 20, 2011;

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 7, 2012;

2013, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2014;

2017, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 169.
Brochure distribution fees.

The Department of Buildings and General Services is authorized to accept brochure distribution fees, and to enter into agreements with other State agencies and departments to provide marketing, promotion, and advertising services.

A special fund is established to be administered as provided under 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and to be known as the Brochure Distribution Special Fund for the purposes of ensuring that the fees collected under this section are utilized to fund travel destination promotion, information at the State’s travel information centers, and operations and maintenance of State travel information centers. Revenues to the Fund shall be those fees collected for the placement and distribution of brochures of businesses in the State travel information centers and in other locations deemed appropriate by the Department.

Brochure distribution fees authorized under subsection (a) of this section shall be set by the Department and shall be based on the location or locations of distribution, the size of the brochures, and the number of brochures distributed. The Department shall report the details of the fees established under this section every three years pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 605

.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 24; amended

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.114, eff. July 2, 2018.

§ 170.
Parking in State parking lots.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services is authorized to place signs and markings on land or in structures owned or leased by the State, including State parking lots, directing the parking, stopping, standing, and operation of motor vehicles. The driver or owner of any motor vehicle in a State-owned or controlled parking lot shall obey the instructions of any applicable posted sign or marking.

Any sign or marking shall be presumed to have been placed at the direction of the Commissioner unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

On land or in structures owned or leased by the State under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner, the Commissioner or designee, or an enforcement officer, is authorized, pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 1102

, to move, remove, or immobilize, or cause to be moved, removed, or immobilized, any motor vehicle that is stopped, parked, standing, or being operated contrary to applicable posted signs and markings or in the event of an emergency at the expense of the owner of the motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 6, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1999, No. 29

, § 41, eff. May 19, 1999;

2001, No. 61

, § 35, eff. June 16, 2001.